California statutes. Business and Professions Code
 and evaluation. Implementation of this program may not proceed unless appropriate funding is secured from nonprofit philanthropic entities. The board shall report to the Legislature every January during which the program is operational regarding the status of the program and the ability of the program to secure the funding necessary to carry out its required provisions. Notwithstanding Section 11005 of the Government Code, the board may accept funds from nonprofit philanthropic entities.

(f) Nonprofit community health centers that employ participants shall be responsible for ensuring that participants are enrolled in local English-language instruction programs and that the participants attain English-language fluency at a level that would allow the participants to serve the English-speaking patient population when necessary and have the
 literacy level to communicate with appropriate hospital staff when necessary.

(g) For purposes of this program, the fee for a three-year nonrenewable dental permit shall be five hundred forty-eight dollars ($548). A permitholder shall practice only in the nonprofit community health center that offered the permitholder employment and the corresponding hospital. This three-year nonrenewable permit shall be deemed to be a permit in good standing pursuant to the provisions of this chapter for the purpose of participation and reimbursement in all federal, state, and local health programs.

(h) The three-year nonrenewable permit shall terminate upon notice by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the permitholder’s address of record, if, in the board's sole discretion, it has
 determined that either:

(1) The permit was issued by mistake.

(2) A complaint has been received by either board against the permitholder that warrants terminating the permit pending an investigation and resolution of the complaint.

(i) (1) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) to (d), inclusive, of Section 30, the board shall issue a three-year nonrenewable permit pursuant to this section to an applicant who has not provided an individual taxpayer identification number or social security number if the board staff determines the applicant is otherwise eligible for a permit only under the program pursuant to this section, subject to the following conditions:

(A) The applicant shall immediately seek both an appropriate three-year visa and the accompanying social security number from the United States government within 14 days of being issued a medical license under this section.

(B) The applicant shall immediately provide to the board a social security number obtained in accordance with subparagraph (A) within 10 days of the federal government issuing the social security card related to the issued visa.

(C) The applicant shall not engage in the practice of dentistry pursuant to this section until the board determines that the conditions in subparagraphs (A) and (B) have been met.

(2) The board, if it determines that an applicant has met the conditions in paragraph (1), shall notify the applicant that the applicant may engage in the practice of dentistry under the permit in accordance with this section.

(j) All applicable employment benefits, salary, and policies provided by nonprofit community health centers to their current employees shall be provided to medical and dental practitioners from Mexico participating in this pilot program. This shall include nonprofit community health centers providing malpractice insurance coverage.

(k) Beginning 12 months after this pilot program has commenced, an evaluation of the program shall be undertaken with funds provided from philanthropic foundations. The evaluation shall be conducted by one dental school in California and either the National Autonomous University of Mexico or a foreign dental school approved by board. If the evaluation required pursuant to this section does not begin within 15 months after the pilot project has commenced, the evaluation may be performed by an independent consultant selected by the Director of Consumer Affairs. This evaluation shall include, but not be limited to, the following issues and concerns:

(1) Quality of care provided by dentists
 under this pilot program.

(2) Adaptability of these practitioners to California dental standards.

(3) Impact on working and administrative environments in nonprofit community health centers and impact on interpersonal relations with medical licensed counterparts in health centers.

(4) Response and approval by patients.

(5) Impact on cultural and linguistic services.

(6) Increases in medical encounters provided by participating practitioners to limited-English-speaking patient populations and increases in the number of limited-English-speaking patients seeking health care services from nonprofit
 community health centers.

(7) Recommendations on whether the program should be continued, expanded, altered, or terminated.

(8) Progress reports on available data listed shall be provided to the Legislature on achievable time intervals beginning in the second year of implementation of this pilot program. An interim final report shall be issued three months before termination of this pilot program. A final report shall be submitted to the Legislature at the time of termination of this pilot program on all of the above-described data. The final report shall reflect and include how other initiatives concerning the development of culturally and linguistically competent medical and dental providers within California and the United States are impacting communities in need of
 these health care providers.

(l) Costs for administering this pilot program shall be secured from philanthropic entities.

(m) Program applicants shall be responsible for working with the governments of Mexico and the United States in order to obtain the necessary three-year visa
 required for program participation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 246, Sec. 3.   (AB 2860)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.75. Use of Deep Sedation and General Anesthesia [1646. - 1646.13.]

1646.

As used in this article, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Deep sedation” means a drug-induced depression of consciousness during which patients cannot be easily aroused but respond purposefully following repeated or painful stimulation. The ability to independently maintain ventilatory function may be impaired. Patients may require assistance in maintaining a patent airway, and spontaneous ventilation may be inadequate. Cardiovascular function is usually maintained.

(b) “General anesthesia” means a drug-induced loss of consciousness during which patients are not arousable, even by painful stimulation. The ability to independently maintain ventilatory function is often impaired. Patients often require assistance in
 maintaining a patent airway, and positive pressure ventilation may be required because of depressed spontaneous ventilation or drug-induced depression of neuromuscular function. Cardiovascular function may be impaired.

(c) “Good standing” means the license or permit is active and unrestricted by disciplinary action taken pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, is not the subject of an unresolved complaint or review procedure, and is not the subject of any unresolved disciplinary proceeding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 483, Sec. 12.   (SB 1453)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1646.1.

(a) A dentist shall possess an active dentist license or a permit under Section 1638 or 1640 issued by the board and an active general anesthesia permit in order to administer or order the administration of deep sedation or general anesthesia on an outpatient basis for dental patients.

(b) A dentist shall maintain current certification in Advanced Cardiac Life Support (ACLS).

(c) A dentist shall possess a pediatric endorsement of their general anesthesia permit to administer or order the administration of deep sedation or general anesthesia to patients under seven years of age.

(d) A dentist who administers or orders the administration
 of general anesthesia or deep sedation shall be physically present in the treatment facility while the patient is under general anesthesia or deep sedation.

(e) For patients under 13 years of age, all of the following shall apply:

(1) The operating dentist and at least two additional personnel shall be present throughout the procedure involving deep sedation or general anesthesia.

(2) If the operating dentist is the permitted anesthesia provider, then both of the following shall apply:

(A) The operating dentist and at least one of the additional personnel shall maintain current certification in Pediatric Advanced Life Support (PALS) or other board-approved training in pediatric life support and airway management, adopted pursuant to Section 1601.8. The
 additional personnel who is certified in Pediatric Advanced Life Support (PALS) and airway management or other board-approved training in pediatric life support and airway management shall be solely dedicated to monitoring the patient and shall be trained to read and respond to monitoring equipment including, but not limited to, pulse oximeter, cardiac monitor, blood pressure, pulse, capnograph, and respiration monitoring devices.

(B) The operating dentist shall be responsible for initiating and administering any necessary emergency response.

(3) If a dedicated permitted anesthesia provider is monitoring the patient and administering deep sedation or general anesthesia, both of the following shall apply:

(A) The anesthesia provider and the operating dentist, or one other trained personnel, shall be present throughout
 the procedure and shall maintain current certification in Pediatric Advanced Life Support (PALS) and airway management or other board-approved training in pediatric life support and airway management, adopted pursuant to Section 1601.8.

(B) The anesthesia provider shall be responsible for initiating and administering any necessary emergency response and the operating dentist, or other trained and designated personnel, shall assist the anesthesia provider in emergency response.

(f) This article does not apply to the administration of local anesthesia, minimal sedation, or moderate sedation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 483, Sec. 13.   (SB 1453)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1646.2.

(a) A dentist who desires to administer or order the administration of deep sedation or general anesthesia shall apply to the board on an application form prescribed by the board. The dentist shall possess a dentist license or a permit under Section 1638 or 1640 issued by the board that is in good standing, submit an application fee and produce evidence showing that the dentist has successfully completed a minimum of one year of advanced training in anesthesiology and related academic subjects approved by the board, or equivalent training or experience approved by the board, beyond the undergraduate school level, and current certification in Advanced Cardiac Life Support (ACLS).

(b) The application for a permit shall include documentation that equipment and drugs
 required by the board are on the premises.

(c) A dentist may apply for a pediatric endorsement for the general anesthesia permit by providing proof of successful completion of all of the following:

(1) A Commission on Dental Accreditation (CODA)-accredited or equivalent residency training program that provides competency in the administration of deep sedation and general anesthesia on pediatric patients.

(2) At least 20 cases of deep sedation or general anesthesia to patients under seven years of age in the 24-month time period directly preceding application for a pediatric endorsement to establish competency, both at the time of initial application and at renewal. The applicant or permitholder shall maintain and be able to provide proof of these cases upon request by the board for up to three permit renewal periods.
 Patient records submitted to the board pursuant to this paragraph shall be confidential and shall not be disclosed pursuant to any state law, including, but not limited to, the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of the Government Code), except for disclosure pursuant to a lawfully issued subpoena or a written request from a government agency responsible for either enforcement of civil or criminal laws or the professional licensing of individuals that is conducting an investigation about the applicant.

(3) Current certification in Pediatric Advanced Life Support (PALS) or other board-approved training in pediatric life support and airway management, pursuant to Section 1601.8, for the duration of the permit.

(d) Applicants for a pediatric endorsement who otherwise qualify for the pediatric endorsement but lack sufficient cases of pediatric
 sedation to patients under seven years of age may administer deep sedation and general anesthesia to patients under seven years of age under the direct supervision of a general anesthesia permitholder with a pediatric endorsement. The applicant may count these cases toward the 20 cases required to qualify for the applicant’s pediatric endorsement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 483, Sec. 14.   (SB 1453)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1646.3.

(a) A physical evaluation and medical history shall be taken before the administration of deep sedation or general anesthesia.

(b) Medical history, physical evaluation, deep sedation, and general anesthesia records shall be maintained as required by board regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 483, Sec. 15.   (SB 1453)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1646.4.

(a) Prior to the issuance or renewal of a permit for the use of deep sedation or general anesthesia, the board may, at its discretion, require an onsite inspection and evaluation of the licentiate and the facility, equipment, personnel, and procedures utilized by the licentiate. The permit of any dentist who has failed an onsite inspection and evaluation shall be automatically suspended 30 days after the date on which the board notifies the dentist of the failure, unless within that time period the dentist has retaken and passed an onsite inspection and evaluation. Every dentist issued a permit under this article shall have an onsite inspection and evaluation at least once every five years. Refusal to submit to an inspection
 shall result in automatic denial or revocation of the permit.

(b) The board may contract with public or private organizations or individuals expert in dental outpatient general anesthesia to perform onsite inspections and evaluations. The board may not, however, delegate its authority to issue permits or to determine the persons or facilities to be inspected. 

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that the board hire sufficient staff to administer the program and that the fees established pursuant to this section be equivalent to administration and enforcement costs incurred by the board in carrying out this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 929, Sec. 4.   (SB 501)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Operative January 1, 2022, pursuant to Section 1646.13)
-------------------------------------------

1646.5.

A permittee shall be required to complete 24 hours of approved courses of study related to deep sedation or general anesthesia as a condition of renewal of a permit. Those courses of study shall be credited toward the total continuing education hours required by the board pursuant to Section 1645.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 929, Sec. 4.   (SB 501)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Operative January 1, 2022, pursuant to Section 1646.13)
-------------------------------------------

1646.6.

(a) The application fee for a permit or renewal under this article shall not exceed the amount prescribed in Section 1724.

(b) The fee for an onsite inspection shall not exceed the amount prescribed in Section 1724.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that fees established pursuant to this section be equivalent to administrative and enforcement costs incurred by the board in carrying out this article.

(d) At the discretion of the board, the fee for onsite inspection may be collected and retained by a contractor engaged pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1646.4.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 929, Sec. 4.   (SB 501)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Operative January 1, 2022, pursuant to Section 1646.13)
-------------------------------------------

1646.7.

(a) A violation of this article constitutes unprofessional conduct and is grounds for the revocation or suspension of the dentist’s permit or license, or both. The board shall issue probationary terms only for violations that do not result in bodily harm.

(b) A violation of any provision of this article or Section 1682 is grounds for suspension or revocation of the physician and surgeon’s permit issued pursuant to this article by the board. The exclusive enforcement authority against a physician and surgeon by the board shall be to suspend or revoke the permit issued pursuant to this article. The board shall refer a violation of this article by a physician
 and surgeon to the Medical Board of California for its consideration as unprofessional conduct and further action, if deemed necessary by the Medical Board of California, pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000). A suspension or revocation of a physician and surgeon’s permit by the board pursuant to this article shall not constitute a disciplinary proceeding or action for any purpose except to permit the initiation of an investigation or disciplinary action by the Medical Board of California, as authorized by Section 2220.5.

(c) The proceedings under this section shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the board shall have all the
 powers granted therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 929, Sec. 4.   (SB 501)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Operative January 1, 2022, pursuant to Section 1646.13)
-------------------------------------------

1646.8.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to authorize a dentist to administer or directly supervise the administration of general anesthesia or deep sedation for reasons other than dental treatment, as defined in Section 1625.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 929, Sec. 4.   (SB 501)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Operative January 1, 2022, pursuant to Section 1646.13)
-------------------------------------------

1646.9.

(a) A physician and surgeon licensed by the Medical Board of California or Osteopathic Medical Board of California pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000) may administer deep sedation or general anesthesia in the office of a licensed dentist for dental patients, without regard to whether the dentist possesses a permit issued pursuant to this article, if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The physician and surgeon possesses an active license to practice medicine in this state.

(2) The physician and surgeon holds an active general anesthesia permit issued by the Dental Board of California pursuant to subdivision (b).

(3) The physician and surgeon meets the requirements of subdivision (e) of Section 1646.1.

(b) A physician and surgeon who desires to administer deep sedation or general anesthesia as set forth in subdivision (a) shall possess a license issued by the Medical Board of California or the Osteopathic Medical Board of California, as applicable, that is in good standing, shall apply to the board on an application form prescribed by the board, and shall submit all of the following:

(1) Certified license history issued by the Medical Board of California or Osteopathic Medical Board of California, as applicable to the applicant’s license, showing the physician and surgeon license number and current license status. 

(2) The payment of an application fee prescribed by this article.

(3) Evidence showing that the applicant has successfully completed a postgraduate residency training program in anesthesiology that is recognized by the Accreditation Council for Graduate Medical Education.

(4) Documentation demonstrating that all equipment and drugs required by the board are on the premises for use in any dental office in which the applicant administers deep sedation or general anesthesia.

(5) Information relative to the current membership of the applicant on hospital medical staffs.

(c) Prior to issuance or renewal of a permit pursuant to this section, the board may, at its discretion, require an onsite inspection and evaluation of the facility, equipment, personnel, including, but not limited to, the physician and surgeon, and
 procedures utilized. At least one of the persons evaluating the procedures utilized by the physician and surgeon shall be a licensed physician and surgeon expert in outpatient deep sedation or general anesthesia who has been authorized or retained under contract by the board for this purpose.

(d) The permit of a physician and surgeon who has failed an onsite inspection and evaluation shall be automatically suspended 30 days after the date on which the board notifies the physician and surgeon of the failure unless within that time period the physician and surgeon has retaken and passed an onsite inspection and evaluation. Every physician and surgeon issued a permit under this article shall have an onsite inspection and evaluation at least once every five years. Refusal to submit to an inspection shall result in automatic denial or revocation of the permit.

(e) A physician and
 surgeon who additionally meets the requirements of paragraphs (2) and (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 1646.2 may apply to the board for a pediatric endorsement to provide deep sedation or general anesthesia to a child under seven years of age. A physician and surgeon without sufficient cases to obtain a pediatric endorsement may qualify for the endorsement pursuant to the requirements of subdivision (d) of Section 1646.2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 483, Sec. 16.   (SB 1453)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1646.10.

A general anesthesia permit shall expire on the date provided in Section 1715 that next occurs after its issuance, unless it is renewed as provided in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 929, Sec. 4.   (SB 501)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Operative January 1, 2022, pursuant to Section 1646.13)
-------------------------------------------

1646.11.

A general anesthesia permitholder who has a permit that was issued before January 1, 2022, may follow the terms of that existing permit until it expires. Any permit issued or renewed pursuant to this article on or after January 1, 2022, shall require the permitholder to follow the new requirements of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 929, Sec. 4.   (SB 501)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Operative January 1, 2022, pursuant to Section 1646.13)
-------------------------------------------

1646.12.

A pediatric endorsement shall expire on the date specified in Section 1715 that next occurs after its issuance, unless it is renewed as provided in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 483, Sec. 17.   (SB 1453)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1646.13.

This article shall become operative on January 1, 2022.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 929, Sec. 4.   (SB 501)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.84. Use of Moderate Sedation [1647. - 1647.12.]

1647.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that a commendable patient safety record has been maintained in the past by dentists and those other qualified providers of anesthesia services who, pursuant to a dentist’s authorization, administer patient sedation, and that the increasing number of pharmaceuticals and techniques used to administer them for patient sedation require additional regulation to maintain patient safety in the future.

(b) The Legislature further finds and declares all of the following:

(1) That previous laws enacted in 1980
 contained separate and distinct definitions for general anesthesia and the state of consciousness.

(2) That in dental practice, there is a continuum of sedation used which cannot be adequately defined in terms of consciousness and general anesthesia.

(3) That the administration of sedation through this continuum results in different states of consciousness that may or may not be predictable in every instance.

(4) That in most instances, the level of sedation will result in a predictable level of consciousness during the entire time of sedation.

(c) The Legislature further finds and declares that the educational standards presently required for deep sedation and general anesthesia should be required when the degree of sedation in the continuum of sedation is such that there is a reasonable possibility that loss of consciousness may result, even if unintended. However, achieving the degree of moderate sedation, where a margin of safety exists wide enough to render unintended loss of consciousness unlikely, requires educational standards appropriate to the administration of the resulting predictable level of consciousness.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 929, Sec. 6.   (SB 501)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Operative January 1, 2022, pursuant to Section 1647.12.)
-------------------------------------------

1647.1.

(a) As used in this article, “moderate sedation” means a drug-induced depression of consciousness during which a patient responds purposefully to verbal commands, either alone or accompanied by light tactile stimulation, no interventions are required to maintain a patient’s airway, spontaneous ventilation is adequate, and cardiovascular function is usually maintained.

(b) The drugs and techniques used in moderate sedation shall have a margin of safety wide enough to render unintended loss of consciousness unlikely. Further, patients whose only response is reflex withdrawal from painful stimuli shall not be considered to be in a state of
 moderate sedation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 929, Sec. 6.   (SB 501)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Operative January 1, 2022, pursuant to Section 1647.12.)
-------------------------------------------

1647.2.

(a) A dentist may administer or order the administration of moderate sedation on an outpatient basis for a dental patient if the dentist possesses an active dentist license or permit under Section 1638 or 1640 issued by the board and either an active general anesthesia permit or a moderate sedation permit.

(b) A moderate sedation permitholder shall obtain a pediatric endorsement on the moderate sedation permit prior to administering moderate sedation to a patient under 13 years of age.

(c) (1) A moderate sedation permitholder who administers or orders the administration of moderate sedation shall be physically present in the treatment facility while the patient is sedated.

(2) For patients under 13 years of age, there shall be at least two support personnel in addition to the operating dentist present at all times during the procedure involving moderate sedation. The operating dentist and one personnel member shall maintain current certification in Pediatric Advanced Life Support (PALS) and airway management or other board-approved training in pediatric life support and airway management, adopted pursuant to Section 1601.8. The personnel member with current certification in Pediatric Advanced Life Support (PALS) and airway management or other board-approved training in pediatric life support and airway management shall be dedicated to monitoring the patient during the procedure involving moderate sedation and may assist with interruptible patient-related tasks of short duration, such as holding an instrument.

(d) A moderate sedation permitholder shall
 possess the training, equipment, and supplies to rescue a patient from an unintended deeper level of sedation.

(e) This article shall not apply to the administration of local anesthesia, minimal sedation, deep sedation, or general anesthesia.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 483, Sec. 18.   (SB 1453)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1647.3.

(a) A dentist who desires to administer or to order the administration of moderate sedation shall possess a dentist license or a permit under Section 1638 or 1640 issued by the board that is in good standing and apply to the board on an application form prescribed by the board. The dentist shall submit an application fee and produce evidence showing that the dentist has successfully completed training in moderate sedation that meets the requirements of subdivision (c).

(b) The application for a permit shall include documentation that equipment and drugs required by the board are on the premises.

(c) Training in the administration of moderate sedation shall be acceptable if it meets all of the
 following as approved by the board:

(1) Consists of at least 60 hours of instruction.

(2) Requires satisfactory completion of at least 20 cases of administration of moderate sedation for a variety of dental procedures.

(3) Complies with the requirements of the Guidelines for Teaching Pain Control and Sedation to Dentists and Dental Students of the American Dental Association, including, but not limited to, certification of competence in rescuing patients from a deeper level of sedation than intended, and managing the airway, intravascular or intraosseous access, and reversal medications.

(d) A dentist may apply for a pediatric endorsement for a moderate sedation permit by confirming all of the following:

(1) Successful completion of residency in pediatric dentistry accredited by the Commission on Dental Accreditation (CODA) or the equivalent training in pediatric moderate sedation, as determined by the board.

(2) Successful completion of at least 20 cases of moderate sedation to patients under 13 years of age to establish competency in pediatric moderate sedation, both at the time of the initial application and at renewal. The applicant or permitholder shall maintain and shall provide proof of these cases upon request by the board for up to three permit renewal periods.

(3) In order to provide moderate sedation to children under seven years of age, a dentist shall establish and maintain current competency for this pediatric population by completing 20 cases of moderate sedation for children under seven years of age in the
 24-month period immediately preceding application for the pediatric endorsement and for each permit renewal period.

(4) Current certification in Pediatric Advanced Life Support (PALS) and airway management or other board-approved training in pediatric life support and airway management, adopted pursuant to Section 1601.8.

(e) A moderate sedation permitholder with a pediatric endorsement shall maintain current and continuous certification in Pediatric Advanced Life Support (PALS) and airway management or other board-approved training in pediatric life support and airway management, adopted pursuant to Section 1601.8, for the duration of the permit.

(f) Applicants for a pediatric endorsement who otherwise qualify for the pediatric endorsement but lack sufficient cases of moderate sedation to patients under 13 years of
 age may administer moderate sedation to patients under 13 years of age under the direct supervision of a general anesthesia or moderate sedation permitholder who possesses a pediatric endorsement. The applicant may count these cases toward the 20 required in order to qualify for the applicant’s pediatric endorsement.

(g) Moderate sedation permitholders with a pediatric endorsement seeking to provide moderate sedation to children under seven years of age, but who lack sufficient cases of moderate sedation to patients under seven years of age pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (d), may administer moderate sedation to patients under seven years of age under the direct supervision of a general anesthesia or moderate sedation permitholder who possesses a pediatric endorsement to administer general anesthesia or moderate sedation to patients under seven years of age.

(h) Patient
 records submitted to the board pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) and paragraphs (2) and (3) of subdivision (d) shall be confidential and shall not be disclosed pursuant to any state law, including, but not limited to, the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of the Government Code), except for disclosure pursuant to a lawfully issued subpoena or a written request from a government agency responsible for either enforcement of civil or criminal laws or the professional licensing of individuals that is conducting an investigation about the applicant.

(i) If the procedures under paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) or paragraph (3) of subdivision (d) are performed in a dental office located in this state, the following shall apply:

(1) All office facility, equipment, and staff requirements for moderate sedation permitholders shall be
 met.

(2) The procedures shall be performed under the direct supervision of a California-licensed dentist who holds a board-issued general anesthesia or moderate sedation permit.

(3) For procedures performed under paragraph (3) of subdivision (d), the procedures shall be performed under the direct supervision of a California-licensed dentist who holds a board-issued general anesthesia or moderate sedation permit with a pediatric endorsement issued by the board.

(4) The procedures shall be supervised in compliance with subdivision (a) of Section 1682.

(j) For purposes of this section, “good standing” means the license or permit is active and unrestricted by disciplinary action taken pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of
 Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, is not the subject of an unresolved complaint or review procedure, and is not the subject of any unresolved disciplinary proceeding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 483, Sec. 19.   (SB 1453)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1647.4.

A moderate sedation permit shall expire on the date specified in Section 1715 that next occurs after its issuance, unless it is renewed as provided in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 929, Sec. 6.   (SB 501)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Operative January 1, 2022, pursuant to Section 1647.12.)
-------------------------------------------

1647.5.

A permittee shall be required to complete 15 hours of approved courses of study related to moderate sedation as a condition of renewal of a permit. Those courses of study shall be credited toward the total continuing education required by the board pursuant to Section 1645.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 929, Sec. 6.   (SB 501)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Operative January 1, 2022, pursuant to Section 1647.12.)
-------------------------------------------

1647.6.

(a) A physical evaluation and medical history shall be taken before the administration of moderate sedation.

(b) Records of the physical evaluation, medical history, and moderate sedation procedures used shall be maintained as required by board regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 483, Sec. 20.   (SB 1453)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1647.7.

(a) Prior to the issuance or renewal of a permit to administer moderate sedation, the board may, at its discretion, require an onsite inspection and evaluation of the licensee and the facility, equipment, personnel, and procedures utilized by the licensee. The permit of any dentist who has failed an onsite inspection and evaluation shall be automatically suspended 30 days after the date on which the board notifies the dentist of the failure unless, within that time period, the dentist has retaken and passed an onsite inspection and evaluation. Every dentist issued a permit under this article shall have an onsite inspection and evaluation at least once in every six years. Refusal to submit to an inspection shall result in
 automatic denial or revocation of the permit.

(b) An applicant who has successfully completed the course required by Section 1647.3 may be granted a one-year temporary permit by the board prior to the onsite inspection and evaluation. Failure to pass the inspection and evaluation shall result in the immediate and automatic termination of the temporary permit.

(c) The board may contract with public or private organizations or individuals expert in dental outpatient moderate sedation to perform onsite inspections and evaluations. The board may not, however, delegate its authority to issue permits or to determine the persons or facilities to be inspected.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 929, Sec. 6.   (SB 501)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Operative January 1, 2022, pursuant to Section 1647.12.)
-------------------------------------------

1647.8.

(a) The application fee for a permit or renewal under this article shall not exceed the amount prescribed in Section 1724.

(b) The fee for an onsite inspection shall not exceed the amount prescribed in Section 1724.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that the board hire sufficient staff to administer the program and that the fees established pursuant to this section be equivalent to administration and enforcement costs incurred by the board in carrying out this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 929, Sec. 6.   (SB 501)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Operative January 1, 2022, pursuant to Section 1647.12.)
-------------------------------------------

1647.9.

A violation of this article constitutes unprofessional conduct and is grounds for the revocation or suspension of the dentist’s permit or license, or both. The board shall issue probationary terms only for violations that do not result in bodily harm. The proceedings under this section shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the board shall have all the powers granted therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 929, Sec. 6.   (SB 501)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Operative January 1, 2022, pursuant to Section 1647.12.)
-------------------------------------------

1647.10.

A conscious sedation permitholder who has a permit that was issued before January 1, 2022, may follow the terms of that existing permit until it expires. Any permit issued or renewed pursuant to this article on or after January 1, 2022, shall require the permitholder to follow the requirements of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 929, Sec. 6.   (SB 501)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Operative January 1, 2022, pursuant to Section 1647.12.)
-------------------------------------------

1647.12.

This article shall become operative on January 1, 2022.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 929, Sec. 6.   (SB 501)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.86. Use of Oral Conscious Sedation for Adult Patients [1647.18. - 1647.26.]

1647.18.

As used in this article, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Adult patient” means a dental patient 13 years of age or older.
